Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF645.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 179A.07, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Time off. A public employer must afford reasonable time off to elected officers or appointed representatives of the exclusive representative to conduct the duties of the exclusive representative and must, upon request, provide for leaves of absence to elected or appointed officials of the exclusive representative, to elected or appointed officials of an affiliate of an exclusive representative, or to a full-time appointed official of an exclusive representative of teachers in another Minnesota school district.new text begin Time off provided under this subdivision must not be used to engage in any political activities.new text end